Utah statutes.
31A-36-107.   Examinations and retention of records.

(1)  The commissioner may conduct an examination of a life settlement provider or life settlement producer in accordance with Sections 31A-2-203, 31A-2-203.5, 31A-2-204, and 31A-2-205.

(2)  A life settlement provider or life settlement producer shall retain for five years copies of:

(a)  the following records, whether proposed, offered, or executed, from the later of the date of the proposal, offer, or execution:

(i)  contracts;

(ii)  purchase agreements;

(iii)  underwriting documents;

(iv)  policy forms; and

(v)  applications;

(b)  checks, drafts, and other evidence or documentation relating to the payment, transfer, or release of money, from the date of the transaction; and

(c)  records and documents related to the requirements of this chapter.

(3)  This section does not relieve a person of the obligation to produce a document described in Subsection (2) to the commissioner after the expiration of the relevant period if the person has retained the document.

(4)  A record required by this section to be retained:

(a)  shall be legible and complete; and

(b)  may be retained in any form or by any process that accurately reproduces or is a durable medium for the reproduction of the record.

(5)  An examiner may not be appointed by the commissioner if the examiner, either directly or indirectly, has a conflict of interest or is affiliated with the management of or owns a pecuniary interest in a person subject to examination under this chapter.  This Subsection (5) does not automatically preclude an examiner from being:

(a)  an owner;

(b)  an insured in a settled policy; or

(c)  a beneficiary in a policy that is proposed to be settled.

(6) (a)  An examinee under this section shall reimburse the cost of an examination to the department consistent with Section 31A-2-205.

(b)  Notwithstanding Subsection (6)(a), an individual life settlement producer is not subject to Section 31A-2-205.



Amended by Chapter 297, 2011 General Session

